Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2620
Nonresident consultant; personal jurisdiction.

Obtaining a nonresident license shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such a person in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of any interested person arising out of the applicant's consulting business in Nebraska.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 15;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 66.